pt-BR: Acabamento da lâmpada: Âmbar; Transparente; Colorido; Fosco; Meia cúpula cromada; Frente espelhada; Opalino; Prismático; Prateado; Outro
ko: 전구 마감: 앰버 틴티드; 투명; 유색; 반투명; 하프 크롬; 미러 프런트; 유백색; 프리즘형; 은막; 기타
de: Glühbirnenoberfläche: Bernsteinfarben; Transparent; Gefärbt; Mattiert; Halbverchromt; Spiegelfront; Opal; Prismatisch; Versilbert; Sonstiges
fr: Finition du verre de l’ampoule: Teinte ambrée; Clair; Colorés; Givré; Demi-chrome; Miroir avant; Opal; Prismatique; Argenté; Autre
tr: Ampul yüzey kaplaması: Kehribar renkli; Şeffaf; Renkli; Buzlu; Yarı krom kaplama; Aynalı ön yüz; Opal; Prizmatik; Gümüş; Diğer
ja: 電球の仕上げ: 琥珀色; クリア; カラー; フロスト; ハーフクローム; ミラーフロント; オパール; プリズム; シルバー; その他
en: Bulb finish: Amber tinted; Clear; Colored; Frosted; Half chrome; Mirror front; Opal; Prismatic; Silvered; Other
es: Acabado de la bombilla: Ámbar teñido; Clara; De color; Escarchado; Medio cromado; Espejo frontal; Ópalo; Prismático; Plateado; Otros
fi: Lampun viimeistely: Meripihkan sävyinen; Läpinäkyvä; Värjätty; Himmeä; Puoliksi kromattu; Peili edessä; Opaali; Prismaattinen; Hopeoitu; Muu
hr-HR: Završna obrada žarulje: Jantarna boja; Prozirno; Obojena; Zamrznuto; Djelomično kromirano; Zrcalna prednja strana; Opal; Prizmatična završna obrada; Posrebreno; Ostalo
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava žiarovky: Jantárový odtieň; Priehľadná; Farbená; Matná; Polochróm; Zrkadlová predná strana; Opálová; Prizmatická; Postriebrená; Iné
th: ผิวเคลือบหลอดไฟ: สีเหลืองอำพัน; ใส; สี; ฝ้า; โครเมียมครึ่งดวง; หน้ากระจกเงา; โอปอล; แบบพริสมาติก; สีเงิน; อื่นๆ
ru: Отделка лампы: Янтарный оттенок; Прозрачное; Цветное; Матовое; Полухром; Переднее зеркало; Опаловое; Призматический; Серебристое; Другое
sl-SI: Končna obdelava žarnice: Jantarno obarvano; Prozorna; Barvane; Zamrznjeno; Pol kroma; Sprednje ogledalo; Opal; Prizmatična; Posrebreno; Druga
bg-BG: Покритие на крушката: Кехлибарено оцветяване; Прозрачно; Боядисано; Матирано; Наполовина хромирано; Огледална предна част; Опал; Призматично; Посребрено; Друго
vi: Lớp hoàn thiện bóng đèn: Màu hổ phách; Trong suốt; Có màu; Mờ đục; Mạ crôm một nửa; Mặt trước tráng gương; Ôpan; Lăng trụ; Màu bạc; Khác
ro-RO: Finisajul becului: Nuanță chihlimbar; Transparent; Colorat; Înghețat; Semicromat; Oglindă frontală; Opalescent; Prismatic; Argintat; Altele
hu: Izzó felülete: Borostyánszínű; Átlátszó; Színezett; Matt; Fél króm; Elöl tükör; Opál; Prizma alakú; Ezüstözött; Egyéb
sv: Glödlampans ytbehandling: Bärnstensfärgad; Genomskinlig; Färgad; Frostad; Halvkrom; Spegelfront; Opal; Prismatisk; Silvrad ; Övrigt
cs: Povrchová úprava žárovky: Jantarově zbarvená; Čiré; Barevné; Matné/mléčné; Se zrcadlovým vrchlíkem; Se zrcadlovou špičkou; Opálové; Prizmatická; Stříbřené; Jiné
zh-TW: 燈泡飾面: 琥珀色; 透明; 彩色; 磨砂; 半鉻; 鏡子正面; 玻光; 稜鏡; 鍍銀; 其他
pt-PT: Acabamento da lâmpada: Cor âmbar; Transparente; Pintado; Fosco; Semicromado; Frente espelhada; Opala; Prismática; Prateado; Outro
lt-LT: Lemputės apdaila: Gintaro spalvos; Skaidri; Spalvota; Matinė; Pusiau chromuotas; Veidrodinis priekis; Opalo; Prizminis; Sidabro; Kita
nb: Pærefinish: Ravfarget; Gjennomsiktig; Farget; Frostet; Halvt krom; Speilfront; Opal; Prismatisk; Forsølvet; Annet
zh-CN: 灯泡饰面: 琥珀色; 透明; 彩色; 磨砂; 半镀铬; 镜面前面; 乳白; 棱镜; 镀银; 其他
it: Finitura della lampadina: Color ambra; Trasparente; Colorati; Smerigliato; Mezzo cromo; Specchio frontale; Opale; Prismatico; Argentato; Altro
nl: Lampafwerking: Amberkleurig; Transparant; Gekleurd; Mat; Half verchroomd; Spiegelfront; Opaal; Prismatisch; Verzilverd; Overig
da: Pærefinish: Ravfarvet; Klar; Farvet; Frost; Halvt forkromet; Spejlfront; Opal; Prismatisk; Sølv; Andet
pl: Wykończenie żarówki: Bursztynowe zabarwienie; Przezroczyste; Kolorowe; Matowe; Półchrom; Z lustrzanym przodem; Opalowe; Pryzmatyczny; Lustrzane; Pozostałe
el: Φινίρισμα λαμπτήρα: Κεχριμπαρένια απόχρωση; Διάφανο; Εγχρωμο; Με εφέ αμμοβολής; Μισό χρώμιο; Καθρεπτιζόμενη πρόσοψη; Οπάλιο; Πρισματικό; Καθρεφτιζόμενο; Άλλο